Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 39. Extortion and Threats

§ 1701.
Definition and penalty.

A person who maliciously threatens to accuse another of a crime or offense, or with an injury to his or her person or property, with intent to extort money or other pecuniary advantage, or with intent to compel the person so threatened to do an act against his or her will, shall be imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1973, No. 109, § 6; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 1702.
Criminal threatening.

A person shall not by words or conduct knowingly:

threaten another person; and

as a result of the threat, place the other person in reasonable apprehension of death or serious bodily injury.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section with the intent to prevent another person from reporting to the Department for Children and Families the suspected abuse or neglect of a child shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

As used in this section:

“Serious bodily injury” shall have the same meaning as in section 1021 of this title.

“Threat” and “threaten” shall not include constitutionally protected activity.

Any person charged under this section who is under 18 years of age shall be adjudicated as a juvenile delinquent.

It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge under this section that the person did not have the ability to carry out the threat. The burden shall be on the defendant to prove the affirmative defense by a preponderance of the evidence.

HISTORY:

Added 2015, No. 162 (Adj. Sess.), § 6b.

§ 1703.
Domestic terrorism.

As used in this section:

“Domestic terrorism” means engaging in or taking a substantial step to commit a violation of the criminal laws of this State with the intent to:

cause death or serious bodily injury to multiple persons; or

threaten any civilian population with mass destruction, mass killings, or kidnapping.

“Serious bodily injury” shall have the same meaning as in section 1021 of this title.

“Substantial step” means conduct that is strongly corroborative of the actor’s intent to complete the commission of the offense.

A person who willfully engages in an act of domestic terrorism shall be imprisoned for not more than 20 years or fined not more than $50,000.00, or both.

It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge under this section that the actor abandoned his or her effort to commit the crime or otherwise prevented its commission under circumstances manifesting a complete and voluntary renunciation of his or her criminal purpose.

HISTORY:

Added 2017, No. 135 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 21, 2018.